Maryland, session 2025, HB1423.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Commission to Review and Assess Racial Disparities in the State
Criminal Justice System.
(b) The Commission consists of the following members:
(1) two members of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) two members of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of
the House;
(3) one representative of the Administrative Office of the Courts, appointed
by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court of Maryland;
(4) the President of the Maryland State’s Attorneys’ Association, or the
President’s designee;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1423*

HOUSE BILL 1423
(5) the Executive Director of the Maryland State Commission on Criminal
Sentencing Policy, or the Executive Director’s designee;
(6) four members of the community with a demonstrated interest and
experience in advocating for improvements to the State’s criminal justice system, with two
members appointed by the President of the Senate and two members appointed by the
Speaker of the House; and
(7) the following members appointed by the Governor:
(i) one representative of the Vera Institute of Justice; and
(ii) one representative of a crime victims’ advocacy group.
(c) The President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House shall each designate
one cochair of the Commission.
(d) The Maryland State Commission on Criminal Sentencing Policy and the
Department of Legislative Services shall jointly provide staff for the Commission.
(e) A member of the Commission:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Commission; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) (1) The Commission shall study and make recommendations on:
(i) the disparate treatment of African Americans, Hispanics, and
other non–White individuals in the State’s criminal justice system, including:
1. how cumulative impacts may result from disparate
policing, arrests, charging, pretrial detention, sentencing, community supervision, and
prosecution, including diversion and plea policies; and
2. the impacts of disparate mandatory minimum sentencing,
including for convictions for:
A. offenses involving firearms; and
B. felony murder cases in which the defendants clearly did
not intend to commit murder;
(ii) the need and alternative methods available to improve any racial
disparities and lack of transparency in the State’s criminal justice system;

HOUSE BILL 1423 3
(iii) improvements available to the systemic structures for
race–neutral risk and needs assessments diversion, sentencing alternatives, rehabilitative
sentencing, and reduction of recidivism;
(iv) the possibility of amending the Maryland Sentencing Guidelines
with respect to the offender score calculation methodology, for the purpose of reducing the
impact of any previously existing racial and ethnic differences caused by excessive policing;
(v) the possibility of using resources of the Division of Parole and
Probation in the Department of Public Safety and Correctional Services to conduct pretrial
and presentence race–neutral risk and needs assessments that could be considered by
parties at the time of plea discussions and by judges at the time of sentencing;
(vi) the potential to increase judicial discretion at sentencing to allow
judges to more closely consider as sentencing factors, including for individuals charged with
or convicted of crimes of violence or sex offenses:
1. the intent of the individuals being sentenced; and
2. the possibility for rehabilitation and reduction in
recidivism;
(vii) the possibility of modifying or abolishing the State’s felony
murder doctrine for cases where individuals clearly did not intend to commit murder;
(viii) the design and expansion of programs intended to:
1. reduce State prison populations;
2. be rehabilitative; and
3. further reduce the length of prison sentences in a manner
that is consistent with public safety; and
(ix) data collection methods for the ongoing monitoring of racial
disparities at each stage of the State’s criminal justice system.
(2) The Commission shall hold at least four public hearings to examine,
discuss, and review the items described in paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(g) On or before September 1, 2026, the Commission shall report, in accordance
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, its findings and recommendations to the
Senate Judicial Proceedings Committee and the House Judiciary Committee.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and, at the end of June 30, 2027,

HOUSE BILL 1423
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.